test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-siamu_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - siämu: # eres - ok
    siämu+N+Sg+Nom: siämu
    siämu+N+Sg+Gen: siämmun
    siämu+N+Sg+Acc: siämmun
    siämu+N+Sg+Ill: siäˊṃunân
    siämu+N+Sg+Loc: siäˊṃunist
    siämu+N+Sg+Com: siäˊṃunáin
    siämu+N+Sg+Abe: siämmunttáá
    siämu+N+Ess: [siämun, siäˊṃunin]
    siämu+N+Par: [siämud, siäˊṃunid]
    siämu+N+Pl+Nom: siäˊṃuneh
    siämu+N+Pl+Gen: siäˊṃunij
    siämu+N+Pl+Acc: siäˊṃunijd
    siämu+N+Pl+Ill: siäˊṃunáid
    siämu+N+Pl+Loc: siäˊṃunijn
    siämu+N+Pl+Com: siäˊṃunijguin
    siämu+N+Pl+Abe: siäˊṃunijttáá
